Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201718-3305
Additions; plat; acknowledgment; filing.

Every plat created pursuant to section 18-3304 shall contain a statement to the effect that the subdivision of (here insert a correct description of the land or parcel subdivided), as appears on this plat, is made with the free consent and in accordance with the desire of the undersigned owners and shall be duly acknowledged before some officer authorized to take the acknowledgment of deeds. When thus executed and acknowledged, the plat shall be filed for record and recorded in the office of the register of deeds and county assessor of the proper county.

Laws 1879, § 105, p. 234;

R.S.1913, § 5093;

C.S.1922, § 4266;

C.S.1929, § 17-415;

R.S.1943, § 17-416;

Laws 1974, LB 757, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-416;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 316.
August 24, 2017
When plat of proposed subdivision is prepared, executed, and filed by landowner without any representations by city with regard to disputed easement, it operates as deed of portion of land set apart for public use. Vakoc Constr. Co. v. City of Wayne, 191 Neb. 45, 213 N.W.2d 721 (1974).

Platting is required before county board can establish a village. State ex rel. Schoonover v. Crabill, 136 Neb. 819, 287 N.W. 669 (1939).

If plat is filed and recorded, failure to sign that plat does not make it void. Pillsbury v. Alexander, 40 Neb. 242, 58 N.W. 859 (1894).